New York, session 2025-2026, A10651.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 380-d of the general business law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (a-1) to read as follows: 3 (a-1) Every consumer reporting agency shall, upon the occurrence of a 4 consumer report requested on any consumer, notify such consumer of the 5 request by mail or electronic mail to the extent practicable. Once 6 notified, the consumer may contact the consumer reporting agency who 7 shall provide, upon the request of such consumer, the name of the person 8 or entity that requested the report, the nature of the request, the date 9 of the request, and the amount of any potential loan relating to such 10 request, to the greatest extent practicable. Such consumer shall provide 11 the consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of identification pursu- 12 ant to subdivision (t) of section three hundred eighty-a of this article 13 before the consumer may receive any information in accordance with this 14 subdivision. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04954-01-5